Utah statutes.
63H-3-102.   Legislative findings -- State purpose.

(1)  The Legislature finds and declares that:

(a)  a Utah Science Center Authority can promote science, Utah's effort in high technology, engineering, the arts, culture, Utah's unique origins, and can enhance tourism and provide a valuable educational forum, and other benefits for Utah's citizens; and

(b)  fostering the development of science, arts, tourism, culture, and educational facilities is a state purpose affecting the welfare of all state citizens and the growth of the economy statewide.

(2)  It is therefore the purpose of this chapter that the state provide a means to foster the development of science, technology, engineering, arts, tourism, cultural, and educational facilities in order to further the welfare of the citizens of the state and its economic growth.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 370, 2011 General Session

